Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-514
Information required in biennial report; effect of failure to provide.

(a) In the biennial report required by section 21-125, a series limited liability company shall include the name of each protected series of the company:

(1) for which the company has previously delivered to the Secretary of State for filing a protected-series designation; and

(2) which has not dissolved and completed winding up.

(b) A failure by a series limited liability company to comply with subsection (a) of this section with regard to a protected series prevents issuance of a certificate of existence pertaining to the protected series but does not otherwise affect the protected series.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 15;

Laws 2019, LB78, § 7.